lt-LT: Vielos dangos medžiaga: Nailonas (poliamidas / PA); PVC (vinilas); Poliuretanas (PU); Be dangos; Kita
sv: Trådbeläggningsmaterial: Nylon (polyamid/PA); PVC (vinyl); Polyuretan (PU); Obelagd; Övrigt
ru: Материал покрытия проволоки: Нейлон (полиамид/ПА); ПВХ (винил); Полиуретан (ПУ); Без покрытия; Другое
sl-SI: Material premaza žiga: Najlon (poliamid/PA); PVC (vinil); Poliuretan (PU); Brez premaza/golo; Drugo
sk-SK: Materiál povrchovej úpravy drôtu: Nylon (polyamid/PA); PVC (vinyl); Polyuretán (PU); Bez povrchovej úpravy; Iné
nl: Draad coating materiaal: Nylon (polyamide/PA); PVC (vinyl); Polyurethaan (PU); Ongecoat; Overige
hr-HR: Materijal izolacije žice: Najlon (poliamid / PA); PVC (vinil); Poliuretan (PU); Bez obloge; Ostalo
tr: Tel kaplama malzemesi: Naylon (poliamid/PA); PVC (vinil); Poliüretan (PU); Kaplamasız; Diğer
cs: Materiál povlaku drátu: Nylon (polyamid/PA); PVC (vinyl); Polyuretan (PU); Bez potahu; Jiné
pt-PT: Material de revestimento do fio: Nylon (poliamida/PA); PVC (vinil); Poliuretano (PU); Sem revestimento; Outro
bg-BG: Материал за покритие на тел: Найлон (полиамид/PA); PVC (винил); Полиуретан (PU); Без покритие; Друго
ro-RO: Materialul de acoperire al sârmei: Nailon (poliamidă/PA); PVC (vinil); Poliuretan (PU); Neacoperit; Altele
hu: Huzalbevonat anyaga: Nejlon (poliamid/PA); PVC (vinil); Poliuretán (PU); Bevonat nélküli; Egyéb
en: Wire coating material: Nylon (polyamide/PA); PVC (vinyl); Polyurethane (PU); Uncoated; Other
es: Material de recubrimiento del alambre: Nailon (poliamida/PA); PVC (vinilo); Poliuretano (PU); Sin recubrimiento; Otro
pt-BR: Material de revestimento da fiação: Nylon (poliamida/PA); PVC (vinil); Poliuretano (PU); Sem revestimento; Outro
de: Material der Drahtbeschichtung: Nylon (Polyamid/PA); PVC (Vinyl); Polyurethan (PU); Unbeschichtet; Sonstige
zh-CN: 线材涂层材料: 尼龙（聚酰胺/PA）; PVC（乙烯基）; 聚氨酯 (PU); 无涂层; 其他
fr: Matériau de revêtement pour fils métalliques: Nylon (polyamide/PA); PVC (vinyle); Polyuréthane (PU); Non revêtu; Autre
fi: Langan pinnoitteen materiaali: Nailon (polyamidi/PA); PVC (vinyyli); Polyuretaani (PU); Pinnoittamaton; Muu
th: วัสดุหุ้มลวด: ไนลอน (โพลีเอไมด์/PA); PVC (ไวนิล); โพลิยูรีเทน (PU); ไม่เคลือบผิว; อื่นๆ
ko: 와이어 코팅 소재: 나일론(폴리아미드/PA); PVC(비닐); 폴리우레탄(PU); 비코팅; 기타
vi: Chất liệu lớp phủ vỏ dây điện: Nylon (polyamide/PA); PVC (vinyl); Polyurethane (PU); Không phủ; Khác
el: Υλικό επικάλυψης σύρματος: Νάιλον (πολυαμίδιο/PA); PVC (βινύλιο); Πολυουρεθάνη (PU); Χωρίς επίστρωση; Άλλο
pl: Materiał powłoki drutu: Nylon (poliamid/PA); PVC (winyl); Poliuretan (PU); Bez powłoki; Inny
ja: ワイヤー被覆素材: ナイロン (ポリアミド/PA); PVC (ビニール); ポリウレタン (PU); コーティングなし; その他
it: Materiale di rivestimento del filo: Nylon (poliammide/PA); PVC (vinile); Poliuretano (PU); Non rivestito; Altro
da: Ledningens belægningsmateriale: Nylon (polyamid/PA); PVC (vinyl); Polyurethan (PU); Ubelagt; Andet
nb: Trådbeleggsmateriale: Nylon (polyamid/PA); PVC (vinyl); Polyuretan (PU); Ubelagt; Annet
zh-TW: 線材塗層材質: 尼龍 (聚醯胺/PA); PVC (乙烯基); 聚氨酯 (PU); 無塗層; 其他